Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,110
Hospital authority; bonds; obligee; rights.

An obligee of the authority shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

(1) By mandamus, suit, action or proceeding in law or equity, all of which may be joined in one action, to compel the authority, and the trustees, officers, agents or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision and covenant contained in any resolutions, contracts or trust indentures of the authority, and to require the carrying out of any or all covenants and agreements of the authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the authority by the provisions of sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120; or

(2) By suit, action or proceeding in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the authority.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.110.